lexd/verb.lexd
PATTERNS
NPastVerbStem [<v><pres>:]  [:-]? PresSuffixes FutureClitic?
PastVerbStem  [<v><pst>:]         PronClitics?

# Про вставку йота см clitics.lexd
LEXICON PresSuffixes
<1sg>:{Й}ум
<2sg>:{Й}и
<3sg>:т
<3sg>:д
<1pl>:{Й}āм
<2pl>:{Й}ет
<3pl>:{Й}ен
